Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1624
Agent's permit; form; contents.

The agent's permit shall be in a form approved by the department and shall state in a clear and conspicuous manner at least the following information:

(1) The date of issuance, effective date, and term;

(2) The correct name and address of the agent; and

(3) The school which such agent is authorized to represent.

The term for which an agent's permit is issued shall not extend for more than three calendar years.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 24;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2824;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 24;

Laws 1999, LB 489, § 5.